Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.445

Public hearings.

The director shall hold public hearings upon any proposal to adopt any new or amended rules and all hearings for the denial, revocation, or suspension of a license issued under this chapter or in any other adjudicative proceeding, and shall comply in all respects with chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

[ 2003 c 326 s 90; 1989 c 175 s 55; 1961 c 182 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.